New York, session 2025-2026, A9380.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (f) of section 81.09 of the mental hygiene law, 2 as amended by chapter 438 of the laws of 2004, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (f) [When judgment grants a petition, the] The court may award a 5 reasonable compensation to a court evaluator, including the mental 6 hygiene legal service, payable by any or all of the petitioner, the 7 person alleged to be incapacitated or the estate of the allegedly inca- 8 pacitated person[. When a judgment denies or dismisses a petition, the 9 court may award a reasonable allowance to a court evaluator, including 10 the mental hygiene legal service, payable by the petitioner or by the 11 person alleged to be incapacitated, or both], in such proportions as the 12 court may deem just. When the person alleged to be incapacitated dies 13 before the determination is made in the proceeding, the court may award 14 a reasonable allowance to a court evaluator, payable by the petitioner 15 or by the estate of the decedent, or by both in such proportions as the 16 court may deem just. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13156-01-5